fts/tsearch_data/russian.dict
бабахнуть/BLMR
баюкать/BLMP
блекнуть/M
брататься/BLMP
бултыхаться/BLMP
вбегать/BLMP
ввинчивать/BLMP
вделать/BLMR
величаться/LMP
взбалтывать/BLMP
взвизгивать/BLMP
вздёрнуть/BLMR
взметывать/LMP
взрываться/BLMP
вкатываться/BLMP
вламываться/BLMP
вмешаться/BLMR
вовлекать/BLMP
воздвигнуть/BMR
вознести/M
воображать/BLMP
воспитывать/BLMP
впаивать/BLMP
впрыгнуть/BLMR
врезаться/LMPRY
вскидывать/BLMP
вспархивать/LMP
вспухать/LMP
всунуться/LMRT
втёсываться/LMP
вчитаться/BLMR
выбрасывать/BLMP
вывертывать/BLMP
выгибаться/BLMP
выгрызать/LMP
выдирать/BLMP
выжирать/LMP
выкалывать/BLMP
выкидываться/BLMP
выковырнуть/BLMR
выкручиваться/BLMP
выливать/BLMP
вымачивать/BLMP
вымотать/BLMR
вынянчивать/LMP
выпихивать/BLMP
выполоскать/BLMRY
выпускаться/LMP
выравниваться/LMP
вырывать/BLMP
высвобождаться/BLMP
выслуживаться/BLMP
выстаивать/LMP
высушиваться/LMP
вытёсывать/LMP
выучивать/BLMP
выцарапывать/BLMP
вычищать/BLMP
вякать/BLMP
глохнуть/BM
грязнуть/M
делаться/LMP
добеливать/BLMP
доволочь/LM
додумывать/BLMP
доигрывать/BLMP
докладывать/BLMP
доливать/BLMP
допекать/BLMP
допрашивать/BLMP
дорезать/BLMPRY
дослушивать/LMP
досыхать/LMP
дошивать/LMP
ерничать/BLMP
заахать/LMR
заблистать/LMR
забрызгать/BLMR
завербовывать/LMP
завираться/LMP
заворачиваться/BLMP
загибаться/LMP
заготавливать/BLMP
задавливать/LMP
задерживать/BLMP
задрапировывать/BLMP
заерзать/BLMR
заигрывать/BLMP
закапать/BLMR
закидать/BLMR
заключаться/LMP
закраивать/LMP
закупоривать/BLMP
залезать/BLMP
заманивать/BLMP
заметать/BLMP
замотаться/LMR
занервничать/LMR
запастись/M
запиликать/LMR
заполаскивать/LMP
запрокинуть/LMRT
запутать/BLMR
заращивать/LMP
заряжать/BLMP
засекречиваться/BLMP
засохнуть/MR
застращать/LMR
засыпаться/LMPRV
затекать/LMP
заточать/LMP
затягиваться/BLMP
захворать/BLMR
захомутать/BLMR
зачертыхаться/LMR
зашибать/LMP
зашушукаться/LMR
зеленеть/BLMP
изведать/BLMR
изгибать/BLMP
иззябнуть/MR
измотаться/LMR
изречь/LM
исковеркать/LMR
исповедать/LM
иссякнуть/BMR
истощать/BLMP
какать/BLMP
квакать/BLMP
колоть/BLM
крепнуть/BM
кустарничать/LMP
лишать/BLMP
лягать/BLMP
махать/BLMPY
модничать/LMP
набегать/BLMP
наваривать/BLMP
навивать/BLMP
нагнетать/BLMP
надавливать/BLMP
надламывать/BLMP
надтёсывать/BLMP
назубривать/LMP
накапливать/BLMP
наклепывать/LMP
накупать/BLMP
намазывать/BLMP
намёрзнуться/MR
наобещать/BLMR
напихать/BLMR
напридумывать/BLMR
нарезать/BLMPY
наседать/BLMP
настигнуть/MR
насылать/LMP
натыкаться/BLMP
нахлебаться/LMR
нашептывать/BLMP
недоедать/LMP
недоучиваться/LM
нищать/LMP
обвешать/BLMR
обглодать/BLMR
обедать/BLMP
обезнадёживать/LMP
обессиливать/LMP
обжуливать/BLMP
обклеивать/BLMP
облачать/LMP
облицовывать/BLMP
обманывать/BLMP
обмёрзнуть/MR
обнаруживать/LMP
обогреться/BLMR
обосновывать/BLMP
обретать/BLMP
обрызгаться/BLMR
обступать/BLMP
обтянуть/BLMR
обчищать/LMP
обязывать/BLMP
оглянуть/BLMR
огрузнеть/LMR
одолжаться/LMP
озаглавливать/LMP
окалывать/LMP
оковывать/BLMP
окриветь/LMR
омахивать/LMP
опекать/BLMP
оплешиветь/LMR
опостылеть/LMR
опротестовывать/BLMP
опухнуть/BMR
освинцовывать/LMP
оскаливать/LMP
осмелеть/BLMR
остерегаться/BLMP
остывать/BLMP
отблескивать/LMP
отваливаться/LMP
отвиливать/BLMP
отгадать/BLMR
отделывать/BLMP
отжиматься/BLMP
откачать/BLMR
отключаться/BLMP
откромсать/BLMR
отливать/BLMP
отмежёвываться/LMP
отнести/M
отощать/BLMR
отпихивать/BLMP
отпугивать/BLMP
отрубать/BLMP
отсевать/LMP
отстегать/BLMR
отступать/BLMP
оттиснуть/BLMR
отфильтровывать/BLMP
отчитать/BLMR
отшучиваться/LMP
офонареть/LMR
охорашиваться/LMP
очёркивать/LMP
ощипывать/LMP
пеленать/BLMP
переборанивать/LMP
перевенчаться/LMR
перевирать/BLMP
перевязываться/BLMP
перегружать/BLMP
передернуть/BLMR
пережёвывать/BLMP
переиграть/BLMR
перекашивать/LMP
перековывать/LMP
перекрыть/BLMR
перелицовывать/LMP
перемешивать/BLMP
перенасыщать/LMP
переоснащать/BLMP
перепиваться/LMP
перепрыгивать/BLMP
перерубать/BLMP
пересёдлывать/LMP
перестегивать/BLMP
пересчитаться/BLMR
перетряхивать/BLMP
перецарапать/LMR
переэкзаменовывать/LMP
питаться/BLMP
плюхаться/BLMP
поблёкнуть/MR
побулькивать/LMP
повёртываться/LMP
повоспитывать/BLMR
повышаться/LMP
погребать/LMP
подбирать/BLMP
подвёртываться/LMP
подгибаться/BLMP
поддерживать/BLMP
подёргаться/BLMR
подкарауливать/BLMP
подколоть/BLMR
подлетать/BLMP
подминать/BLMP
пододвигаться/BLMP
подписывать/BLMP
подрагивать/BLMP
подряжаться/BLMP
подслушивать/BLMP
подстригаться/BLMP
подтачивать/BLMP
подучать/LMP
подъезжать/BLMP
пожелтеть/BLMR
позеленеть/BLMR
покарать/BLMR
покопаться/BLMR
покусывать/BLMP
поливаться/BLMP
полыхать/BLMP
помёрзнуть/BMR
помыться/BLMR
поникать/LMP
попадаться/BLMP
пополоскать/BLMRY
попутать/LMR
пораскинуть/LMRT
порыскать/BLMRY
посереть/LMR
посметь/BLMR
постирать/BLMR
посыпать/BLMPRV
поторапливаться/BLMP
потягиваться/BLMP
похищаться/LMP
почесывать/BLMP
пошевеливать/LMP
превзойти/M
предостерегать/BLMP
презирать/BLMP
пререкаться/BLMP
приберегать/LMP
привёртывать/BLMP
пригвождать/LMP
пригреть/BLMR
приживаться/LMP
прикапливать/BLMP
приковывать/LMP
прикупать/LMP
примазываться/BLMP
примотать/BLMR
принюхиваться/BLMP
припарковываться/BLMP
приподнимать/BLMP
приравнивать/LMP
прислушиваться/BLMP
пристреливаться/BLMP
притираться/BLMP
приукрашивать/BLMP
прихлебывать/BLMP
причесывать/BLMP
пришлифовывать/BLMP
пробиваться/BLMP
проваливаться/BLMP
проворачивать/BLMP
проговаривать/BLMP
продвинуть/LMRT
продумать/BLMR
прозывать/LMP
прокапать/BLMR
проклинать/BLMP
пролегать/LMP
промерзать/BLMP
пронаблюдать/LMR
пропалывать/LMP
пропихивать/BLMP
прорастать/BLMP
просверливать/LMP
просматривать/BLMP
простуживаться/LMP
проталкиваться/BLMP
протопать/BLMR
прохлаждать/LMP
прошлепать/LMR
пускаться/BLMP
разбиваться/BLMP
разбухнуть/MR
развертывать/BLMP
разворачиваться/BLMP
разглядываться/LMP
раздваиваться/LMP
раздражать/BLMP
разлагаться/BLMP
размахиваться/BLMP
размокнуть/MR
разнюхивать/BLMP
разрабатывать/BLMP
разрушать/BLMP
разъедать/LMP
раскапывать/BLMP
раскидывать/BLMP
раскокать/BLMR
раскрепощать/LMP
раскутывать/LMP
распеленать/LMR
расплачиваться/BLMP
располнеть/BLMR
распутаться/LMR
рассекать/BLMP
рассредотачиваться/LMP
рассуждать/BLMP
растачивать/BLMP
растранжиривать/BLMP
расфыркаться/LMR
расцарапывать/BLMP
расшаркаться/BLMR
решаться/BLMP
рыдать/BLMP
самообольщаться/BLMP
сбрызгивать/LMP
свергнуться/BM
своевольничать/BLMP
сгребать/BLMP
сдернуть/BLMR
сживать/BLMP
скалывать/BLMP
скинуться/LMRT
сколоть/LMR
скрыть/BLMR
сливать/BLMP
сляпать/LMR
сметать/BLMP
смотаться/BLMR
снаряжаться/BLMP
советь/LMP
сожалеть/BLMP
сомлеть/LMR
сосватать/BLMR
сосчитать/BLMR
спариваться/BLMP
сплачивать/BLMP
спрашивать/BLMP
срабатываться/BLMP
срываться/BLMP
стаскивать/BLMP
стихнуть/BMR
стукаться/BLMP
сунуть/LMRT
сшибаться/LMP
сыреть/LM
тиснуть/BLMR
трепыхаться/BLMP
тучнеть/LMP
тянуться/BLM
убывать/BLMP
увиливать/BLMP
угадываться/LMP
удерживать/BLMP
уживаться/BLMP
укладываться/BLMP
укутаться/BLMR
улюлюкать/BLMP
умножаться/LMP
унижаться/BLMP
уписывать/LMP
упрятывать/LMP
усеивать/BLMP
успеть/BLMR
усыпаться/LMPRV
утихнуть/BMR
утыкаться/BLMPR
учреждать/BLMP
харкать/BLMP
хлюпать/BLMP
хрюкнуть/BLMR
цыкнуть/BLMR
чихать/BLMP
шаркать/BLMP
шлёпать/BLMP
щёлкать/BLMP
